Oklahoma, session 2025, SB516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1151.15, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1151.15. A. The Roofing Hearing Board is authorized to
investigate any written complaint received pursuant to the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act, including any person to the extent
necessary to determine if the person is engaged in violations of the
provisions of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act, including
unlawful activity of the practice of contracting for roofing work
without a valid registration, whether the matter is prosecuted
administratively through the Roofing Hearing Board or referred for
criminal prosecution. The Board may refer the matter for
prosecution whether or not the person ceases the unlawful practice
of contracting for roofing work without a valid registration.

B. Service of the notice of violation or citation may be in
person or by certified mail at the last-known business address or
residence address of the person cited.
C. A notice of violation and citation may contain a cease and
desist order for residential roofing contractor work if the
homeowner has been provided the required disclosure and has
exercised the homeowner’s option to cancel the contract as provided
in subsection I of Section 1151.5 of this title, or at any time
during commercial roofing contractor work.
D. The registrar shall read each complaint received and shall
enter a notation in the individual roofing contractor’s record
showing record the date that the verified complaint was received and
the nature of process the complaint as provided by law. The
registrar shall notify the roofing contractor against whom the
complaint is made, in writing, within five (5) days of the receipt
of the written complaint. The roofing contractor shall have ten
(10) days to respond, in writing, to the registrar. If a response
to the complaint is received by the registrar, whether admitting or
denying the basis of the complaint, a copy of both the complaint and
the response shall be sent to the district attorney along with the
results of any investigation by the Board, if the Board does not
retain the matter and refers the complaint to the district attorney.
If no response is received, the complaint may still be referred to
the district attorney, along with the results of any investigation
by the Board. The Board or a Committee of Roofing Examiners member
is authorized to assist in any investigation of a roofing complaint
referred to the district attorney, if requested by the district
attorney. In addition, the registrar shall enter a notation in the
individual roofing contractor’s record showing the date that the
roofing contractor’s response was received, if any, and whether the
response admitted or denied the basis of the complaint.
E. Following referral of a complaint to the district attorney,
if the roofing contractor is adjudicated by the court for an act or
omission specified in subsection A of Section 1151.14 of this title,
or upon a conviction for any violation of the provisions of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, the registrar, when ordered by
the court, shall suspend, revoke or deny the roofing contractor’s
registration for the period of time specified by the court, and if
the court orders the registration suspended, revoked or denied, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 516 Page 2

yet fails to set the term of such suspension, revocation or denial,
the period shall be six (6) months.
F. The registrar shall not renew, reinstate, or issue a new
roofing contractor registration to any person subject to any term of
denial, suspension or revocation until such term has been completed,
and thereafter, the person makes application and pays required fees
pursuant to Sections 1151.8 and 1151.12 of this title.
G. It shall be unlawful for a person to obtain or attempt to
obtain a roofing contractor registration certificate under any other
name during any period when the roofing contractor’s registration is
suspended or revoked. Upon conviction of a violation of this
subsection, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor as provided
in Section 1151.3 of this title. A business firm, partnership,
association, corporation, limited liability company, or other group
or combination thereof acting as a unit whose registration
certificate is suspended or revoked includes all of the members,
partners, officers, and agents acting under that roofing contractor
registration certificate when such persons are specified on and did
sign the application or renewal form.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1151.18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1151.18. Upon request, the registrar shall verify a
roofing contractor registration number to city, county and state
enforcement officials and to the public. The registrar shall
establish through the Internet or other technology a verification
system or direct access system for confirming roofing contractor
registration certificates and status of registration maintained by
the Construction Industries Board. The system shall include the
notation of each complaint received against an individual roofing
contractor, his or her response to each complaint by noting whether
the roofing contractor admits or denies the allegation, any court
disposition of a complaint, if known, and any conviction for a
violation of the provisions of this act. In addition, the system
may include a notation for any conviction of a criminal violation in
this state, another state, or the United States when disclosed by a
criminal history records search on the individual roofing
contractor. Disclosure of any information through use of the
roofing contractor registration system or information maintained by
ENR. S. B. NO. 516 Page 3

the registrar shall not be deemed to be an endorsement of any
roofing contractor or determination of any facts, qualifications,
information or reputation of any roofing contractor by the
registrar, the state, the Construction Industries Board, or any of
their respective agents, officers, employees or assigns.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 516 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 516 Page 5